Utah statutes.
13-7-4.   Business establishment, place of public accommodation, or enterprise regulated by the state denying rights deemed public nuisance -- Investigation and conciliation -- Action to enjoin -- Civil action for damages -- Expenses of defending action.

Any business establishment or place of public accommodation or enterprise regulated by the state in which a violation of the rights provided in Section 13-7-3 of this chapter occurs is a public nuisance.  The operator of any such business establishment or place of public accommodation or enterprise regulated by the state is guilty of maintaining a public nuisance and may be enjoined as hereinafter provided.

(1)  Upon application to the attorney general by any person denied the rights guaranteed by Section 13-7-3, the attorney general shall investigate and seek to conciliate the matter.

(2)  An action to enjoin any nuisance defined in this section may be brought in the name of the state of Utah by the attorney general.  Upon the trial of the cause, on finding that the material allegations of the complaint are true, the court shall order such nuisance to be abated, and enjoin all persons from maintaining or permitting such nuisance.  When any injunction as herein provided has been granted it shall be binding upon the defendant and shall act as an injunction in personam against the defendant throughout the state.

(3)  Any person who is denied the rights provided for in Section 13-7-3 shall have a civil action for damages and any other remedy available in law or equity against any person who denies him the rights provided for in Section 13-7-3 or who aids, incites or conspires to bring about such denial.

(4)  Any business establishment or place of public accommodation or enterprises regulated by the state charged with maintaining a public nuisance in violation of this chapter, which is determined or found not to be in violation of this chapter, may be awarded all actual and necessary expenses incurred in defending such action, as determined and approved by the court having jurisdiction of the matter.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

